Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1367A. Extended benefits.

The extended benefits program shall be administered pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Extended benefit period” means a period which:

Begins with the third week after a week for which there is a state “on” indicator; and

Ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs later:

The third week after the first week for which there is a state “off” indicator; or

The thirteenth consecutive week of such period;

There is a state “on” indicator for any week if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations of the United States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks, the rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted):
(b)(i) There is a state “on” indicator for any week if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations of the United States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks, the rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted):

Equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen (13) week period ending in each of the preceding two (2) calendar years and equaled or exceeded five percent (5%); or

Equaled or exceeded six percent (6%).

With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending on December 31, 2011, or the expiration date in section 502 of the tax relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization and job creation act of 2010, P.L. 111-312, as amended, whichever is later, the average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment in the state, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the three (3) month period referred to in subsection (1)(b)(ii)1. equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent (110%) of such average for any and all of the corresponding three (3) month periods ending in the three (3) preceding calendar years.

With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after February 1, 2009, and ending four (4) weeks prior to the last week for which federal sharing is authorized by section 2005(a) (“full federal funding of extended unemployment compensation for a limited period”) of division B, title II, the assistance for unemployed workers and struggling families act, of the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, P.L. 111-5, as amended, there is a state “on” indicator for any week if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations of the United States secretary of labor that:

There is a state “off” indicator for any week if the director determines, in accordance with the regulations of the United States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks:

The rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted) was less than six percent (6%) and was less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen (13) week period ending in each of the preceding two (2) calendar years; or

The rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted) was less than five percent (5%); or

The option specified in subsection (1)(b)(ii) does not result in an “on” indicator.

“Rate of insured unemployment,” for purposes of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, means the percentage derived by dividing:

The average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular compensation in this state for weeks of unemployment for the most recent thirteen (13) consecutive week period, as determined by the director on the basis of his reports to the United States secretary of labor; by

The average monthly employment covered under this chapter for the first four (4) of the most recent six (6) completed calendar quarters ending before the end of such thirteen (13) week period.

His benefit year having expired prior to such week, has no or insufficient wages on the basis of which he could establish a new benefit year that would include such week; and

Has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances under the railroad unemployment insurance act and such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States secretary of labor; and has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the unemployment insurance law of Canada; but if he is seeking such benefits and the appropriate agency determines that he is not entitled to benefits under such law he is considered an exhaustee.

“Regular benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other state law (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) other than extended benefits.

“Extended benefits” means benefits (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) payable to an individual under the provisions of this section for weeks of unemployment in his eligibility period.

“Eligibility period” of an individual means the period consisting of the weeks in his benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if his benefit year ends within such extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in such period. Eligibility period of an individual also means the period consisting of weeks which begin in his extended benefit period, without regard to his benefit year end date, if the individual qualifies for one hundred percent (100%) federally financed federal-state extended benefits and the one hundred percent (100%) federally financed federal-state extended benefit payment period began on or before the individual exhausted his rights to benefits under the federal emergency unemployment compensation program of 2008.

“Exhaustee” means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in his eligibility period:

Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits that were available to him under this chapter or any regular or extended benefits available to him under any other state law (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) in his current benefit year that includes such week; provided that for the purposes of this subparagraph, an individual shall be deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to him although as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages that were not considered in the original monetary determination in his benefit year, he may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or

“State law” means the unemployment insurance law of any state approved by the United States secretary of labor under section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

For purposes of this section only, the term “suitable work” means, with respect to any individual, any work which is within such individual’s capabilities; except that, if the individual furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that such individual’s prospects for obtaining work in his customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good, the determination of whether any work is suitable work with respect to such individual shall be made in accordance with applicable state law.

Effect of state law provisions relating to regular benefits on claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits. Except when the result would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this section, the provisions of this chapter which apply to claims for, or the payment of, regular benefits shall apply to claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits.

Eligibility requirements for extended benefits. An individual shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his eligibility period only if the director finds that with respect to such week:

The claimant is an “exhaustee” as defined in subsection (1)(h) of this section;

The claimant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claiming extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualification for the receipt of benefits;

The claimant has had twenty (20) weeks of full-time employment for covered employers during his base period, or earned wages for services performed for covered employers during his base period equal to at least one and one-half (1 1/2) times his high quarter wages, or has earned wages for services performed for covered employers during his base period equal to at least forty (40) times his most recent weekly benefit amount.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, payment of extended benefits under this chapter shall not be made to any individual for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period:
(d)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, payment of extended benefits under this chapter shall not be made to any individual for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period:

During which he fails to accept any offer of suitable work, as defined in subsection (1)(j) of this section, or fails to apply for any suitable work to which he was referred; or

During which he fails to actively engage in seeking work.

If such failure would not result in a denial of benefits under the provisions of this chapter to the extent that such provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of subsections (1)(j) and (3)(d)(iv) of this section; or

If the position pays wages less than the higher of:

If any individual is ineligible for extended benefits for any week by reason of a failure described in subsection (3)(d)(i)1. or (3)(d)(i)2. of this section, the individual shall be ineligible to receive extended benefits for any week which begins during a period which:

Extended benefits shall not be denied under subsection (3)(d)(i)1. of this section to any individual for any week by reason of a failure to accept an offer of, or apply for, suitable work:

The individual’s average weekly benefit amount, as determined for purposes of subsection (b)(1)(C) of section 202 of the federal-state extended unemployment compensation act of 1970, for his benefit year; plus

The amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment compensation benefits, as defined in section 501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, payable to such individual for such week.

The minimum wage provided by section 6(a)(1) of the fair labor standards act of 1938, without regard to any exemption; or

Any applicable state or local minimum wage.

For purposes of this paragraph, an individual shall be treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week if:

For purposes of this section only, the department shall refer applicants for extended benefits to any suitable work to which paragraphs 1., 2., 3. and 4. of subsection (3)(d)(iii) of this section would not apply.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, payment of extended benefits shall not be made to any individual for any week if:
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, payment of extended benefits shall not be made to any individual for any week if:

Extended benefits would, but for this subsection have been payable for such week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan; and

An extended benefit period is not in effect for such week in such state.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply with respect to the first two (2) weeks for which extended benefits are payable, determined without regard to this subsection, pursuant to an interstate claim filed under the interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from the extended benefits account established for the benefit year.

Section 3304(a)(9)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 shall not apply to any denial of benefits required under this subsection.

Weekly extended benefit amount. The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his eligibility period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him during his applicable benefit year.

Total extended benefit amount. The total extended benefit amount payable to an eligible individual with respect to his applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:
(6)(a) Total extended benefit amount. The total extended benefit amount payable to an eligible individual with respect to his applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:

Fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of regular benefits which were payable to him under this chapter in his applicable benefit year;

Thirteen (13) times his weekly benefit amount which was payable to him under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year;
(iii) Provided that the amount so determined shall be reduced by the total amount of extended benefits paid, or being paid, to the individual for weeks of extended unemployment in the individual’s benefit year which began prior to the effective date of the federal-state extended benefit period which is current in the week for which the individual first claims such benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the benefit year of any individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits that such individual would, but for the provisions of this section, be entitled to receive in that extended benefit period, with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall be reduced, but not below zero (0), by the product of the number of weeks for which the individual received any amounts as trade readjustment allowances within that benefit year, multiplied by the individual’s weekly benefit amount for extended benefits.

Effective with respect to weeks beginning in a high unemployment period, subsection (6)(a) of this section shall be applied by substituting:
(b)(i) Effective with respect to weeks beginning in a high unemployment period, subsection (6)(a) of this section shall be applied by substituting:

“Eighty percent (80%)” for “fifty percent (50%)” in subsection (6)(a)(i) of this section; and

“Twenty (20)” for “thirteen (13)” in subsection (6)(a)(ii) of this section.

For purposes of subsection (6)(b)(i) of this section, the term “high unemployment period” means any period during which an extended benefit period would be in effect if subsection (1)(b)(ii) were applied by substituting “eight percent (8%)” in subsection (1)(b)(ii)1. for “six and five-tenths percent (6.5%).”

Beginning and termination of extended benefit period. Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state “on” indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of a state “off” indicator, the director shall make a public announcement.
(7)(a) Beginning and termination of extended benefit period. Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state “on” indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of a state “off” indicator, the director shall make a public announcement.

Computations required by the provisions of subsection (1)(d) of this section shall be made by the director, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the United States secretary of labor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, none of the benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be charged to an employer’s account for purposes of experience rating.

Whenever a program of unemployment benefits becomes available that is financed entirely by the federal government, and such program will not allow payments to individuals who are entitled to extended benefits pursuant to this section, the governor may, by executive order, trigger off an extended benefit period as defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section in order to provide payment of such federal benefits to individuals who have exhausted their right to regular benefits. When the federal benefits are exhausted, or if the director determines that payment of extended benefits would be more economically advantageous to the state of Idaho, the governor shall, by executive order, trigger extended benefits on if the criteria of subsection (1)(b) of this section are otherwise met.

Until conformity with the federal-state extended unemployment compensation act of 1970 requires otherwise, the eligibility requirements in subsections (1)(j) and (3)(d) of this section are suspended. Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the eligibility requirements of section 72-1366, Idaho Code, applicable to claims for regular benefits shall apply in lieu of the suspended provisions.

provided, that no extended benefit period may begin by reason of a state “on” indicator before the fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.

1. The average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period consisting of the most recent three (3) months for which data for all states are published before the close of such week equals or exceeds six and five-tenths percent (6.5%); and

2. The average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment in the state, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the three (3) month period referred to in subsection (1)(b)(ii)1. equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent (110%) of such average for either or both of the corresponding three (3) month periods ending in the two (2) preceding calendar years.

1. Begins with the week following the week in which such failure occurs; and

2. Does not end until such individual has been employed during at least four (4) weeks which begin after such failure and the total of the remuneration earned by the individual for being so employed is not less than the product of four (4) multiplied by the individual’s average weekly benefit amount.

1. If the gross average weekly remuneration payable to such individual for the position does not exceed the sum of:

2. If the position was not offered to such individual in writing or was not listed with the department;

1. The individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during such week; and

2. The individual provides tangible evidence to the department that he has engaged in such an effort during such week.

§ 72-1367B. Additional extended benefits — Charge benefits paid

Termination of benefits. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1368. Claims for benefits — Appellate procedure — Limitation of actions.

Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe.

Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals performing services for him printed statements concerning benefit rights under this chapter which shall be provided by the department without cost to the employer.

Following the filing of a claim pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the department shall:
(3)(a) Following the filing of a claim pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the department shall:

Verify the claimant’s monetary eligibility pursuant to the requirements of section 72-1367, Idaho Code, and issue a determination. If monetarily eligible, the department shall establish the date the claimant’s benefit year begins, the weekly benefit amount, the total benefit amount, the base period wages, and the base period covered employers.

If a claimant is monetarily eligible, the department shall verify, based on information provided by the claimant, whether the week claimed is a compensable week as defined in section 72-1312, Idaho Code. To receive benefits, a claimant must certify that each week claimed is a compensable week. In the event the week claimed is not a compensable week, the department shall issue a determination denying benefits and shall include the reasons for the ineligibility.

If the department has reason to believe at any time within five (5) years from the week ending date for any week in which benefits were paid that a claimant was not eligible for benefits, the department may investigate the claim and on the basis of facts found issue a determination denying or allowing benefits for the week(s) in question. If the department determines a claimant was not entitled to benefits received, the department shall issue a determination requiring repayment of the overpaid benefits, and assess any applicable penalties and interest.

Before a determination provided for in subsection (3) of this section becomes final or an appeal is filed, the department, on its own motion, may issue a revised determination. The determination or revised determination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice, as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department.

Upon appeal of a determination or revised determination, the director shall transfer the appeal directly to an appeals examiner pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, unless the director finds, in his sole discretion, that a redetermination should be issued affirming, reversing or modifying the determination or revised determination. The redetermination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the department’s rules.
(4)(a) Upon appeal of a determination or revised determination, the director shall transfer the appeal directly to an appeals examiner pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, unless the director finds, in his sole discretion, that a redetermination should be issued affirming, reversing or modifying the determination or revised determination. The redetermination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the department’s rules.

The director may, in his sole discretion, make a special redetermination whenever he finds that a departmental error has occurred in connection with a determination, revised determination or redetermination that has become final, or that additional wages of the claimant or other facts pertinent to such final determination, revised determination or redetermination have become available or have been newly discovered, or that benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount of benefits fixed on the basis of nondisclosure or misrepresentation of fact. The special redetermination must be made within one (1) year from the date the determination, revised determination or redetermination became final, except that a special redetermination involving a finding that benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount of benefits fixed on the basis of nondisclosures or misrepresentations of fact may be made within two (2) years from the date the determination, revised determination or redetermination became final.
(5) All interested parties shall be entitled to prompt service of notice of written or digital communications from the department providing notice of an administrative or other deadline including, but not limited to, determinations, revised determinations, redeterminations, special redeterminations, decisions and letters from the department requiring a response within a specified time. Notice shall be deemed served if delivered to the person being served, if mailed to his last known address or if electronically transmitted to him at his request and with the department’s approval. Service by mail shall be deemed complete on the date of mailing. Service by electronic transmission shall be deemed complete on the date notice is electronically transmitted.

The pendency of a time period for filing an appeal or petitioning for commission review; or

The pendency of an appeal or petition for review.

(6) To hear and decide appeals from determinations, revised determinations, redeterminations, and special redeterminations, the director shall appoint appeals examiners. Unless the appeal is withdrawn, the appeals examiner shall affirm, modify, set aside or reverse the determination, revised determination, redetermination, or special redetermination involved, after affording the interested parties reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, or may refer a matter back to the department for further action. The appeals examiner shall notify the interested parties of his decision by serving notice in the same manner as provided in subsection (5) of this section. The decision shall set forth findings of fact and conclusions of law. The appeals examiner may, either upon application for rehearing by an interested party or on his own motion, rehear, affirm, modify, set aside or reverse any prior decision on the basis of the evidence previously submitted or on the basis of additional evidence; provided, that such application or motion be made within ten (10) days after the date of service of the decision. A complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with an appealed claim. All testimony at any hearing shall be recorded. If a claim for review of the appeals examiner’s decision is filed with the commission, the testimony shall be transcribed if ordered by the commission. Witnesses subpoenaed by the appeals examiner shall be allowed fees at a rate prescribed by the director. If any interested party to a hearing formally requests the appeals examiner to issue a subpoena for a witness whose evidence is deemed necessary, the appeals examiner shall promptly issue the subpoena, unless such request is determined to be unreasonable. Unless an interested party shall within fourteen (14) days after service of the decision of the appeals examiner file with the commission a claim for review or unless an application or motion is made for a rehearing of such decision, the decision of the appeals examiner shall become final.

(7) The commission shall decide all claims for review filed by any interested party in accordance with its own rules of procedure not in conflict herewith. The record before the commission shall consist of the record of proceedings before the appeals examiner, unless it appears to the commission that the interests of justice require that the interested parties be permitted to present additional evidence. In that event, the commission may, in its sole discretion, conduct a hearing or may remand the matter back to the appeals examiner for an additional hearing and decision. On the basis of the record of proceedings before the appeals examiner as well as additional evidence, if allowed, the commission shall affirm, reverse, modify, set aside or revise the decision of the appeals examiner or may refer the matter back to the appeals examiner for further proceedings. The commission shall file its decision and shall promptly serve notice of its decision to all interested parties. A decision of the commission shall be final and conclusive as to all matters adjudicated by the commission upon filing the decision in the office of the commission; provided, within twenty (20) days from the date of filing the decision, any party may move for reconsideration of the decision or the commission may rehear or reconsider its decision on its own initiative. The decision shall be final upon denial of a motion for rehearing or reconsideration or the filing of the decision on reconsideration.

(8) No person acting on behalf of the director or any member of the commission shall participate in any case in which he has a direct or indirect personal interest.

(9) An appeal may be made to the Supreme Court from decisions and orders of the commission within the times and in the manner prescribed by rule of the Supreme Court.

(10)(a) Benefits shall be paid promptly in accordance with any decision allowing benefits, regardless of:

(b) Such payments shall not be withheld until a subsequent appeals examiner decision or commission decision modifies or reverses the previous decision, in which event benefits shall be paid or denied in accordance with such decision.

(11)(a) Any right, fact, or matter in issue, directly based upon or necessarily involved in a determination, redetermination, decision of the appeals examiner or decision of the commission which has become final, shall be conclusive for all the purposes of this chapter as between the interested parties who had notice of such determination, redetermination or decision. Subject to appeal proceedings and judicial review by the Supreme Court as set forth in this section, any determination, redetermination or decision as to rights to benefits shall be conclusive for all purposes of this chapter and shall not be subject to collateral attack irrespective of notice.

(b) No finding of fact or conclusion of law contained in a decision or determination rendered pursuant to this chapter by an appeals examiner, the industrial commission, a court, or any other person authorized to make such determinations shall have preclusive effect in any other action or proceeding, except proceedings that are brought (i) pursuant to this chapter, (ii) to collect unemployment insurance contributions, (iii) to recover overpayments of unemployment insurance benefits, or (iv) to challenge the constitutionality of provisions of this chapter or administrative proceedings under this chapter.

(12) The provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, regarding contested cases and judicial review of contested cases are inapplicable to proceedings involving claimants under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 72-1369. Overpayments, civil penalties and interest — Collection and waiver.

Any person who received benefits to which he was not entitled under the provisions of this chapter or under an unemployment insurance law of any state or of the federal government shall be liable to repay the benefits and the benefits shall, for the purpose of this chapter, be considered to be overpayments.

Civil penalties. The director shall assess the following monetary penalties for each determination in which the claimant is found to have made a false statement, misrepresentation, or failed to report a material fact to the department:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of any resulting overpayment for the first determination;

Fifty percent (50%) of any resulting overpayment for the second determination; and

One hundred percent (100%) of any resulting overpayment for the third and any subsequent determination.

Any overpayment, civil penalty and/or interest which has not been repaid may, in addition to or alternatively to any other method of collection prescribed in this chapter, including the creation of a lien as provided by section 72-1360, Idaho Code, be collected with interest thereon at the rate prescribed in section 72-1360(2), Idaho Code. The director may also file a civil action in the name of the state of Idaho. In bringing such civil actions for the collection of overpayments, penalties and interest, the director shall have all the rights and remedies provided by the laws of this state, and any person adjudged liable in such civil action for any overpayments shall pay the costs of such action. A civil action filed pursuant to this subsection shall be commenced within five (5) years from the date of the final determination establishing liability to repay. Any judgment obtained pursuant to this section shall, upon compliance with the requirements of chapter 19, title 45, Idaho Code, become a lien of the same type, duration and priority as if it were created pursuant to section 72-1360, Idaho Code.

Collection of overpayments and civil penalties.

Overpayments, other than those resulting from a false statement, misrepresentation, or failure to report a material fact by the claimant, which have not been repaid or collected, may, at the discretion of the director, be deducted from any future benefits payable to the claimant under the provisions of this chapter. Such overpayments not recovered within five (5) years from the date of the final determination establishing liability to repay may be deemed uncollectible.

Overpayments resulting from a false statement, misrepresentation, or failure to report a material fact by the claimant which have not been recovered within eight (8) years from the date of the final determination establishing liability to repay may be deemed uncollectible.

The civil penalty assessed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be paid as follows:

An amount totaling fifteen percent (15%) of the overpayment shall be paid into the employment security fund created in section 72-1346, Idaho Code; and

Any additional amounts collected shall be paid into the employment security administrative and reimbursement fund created in section 72-1348, Idaho Code.

The director may waive the requirement to repay an overpayment, other than one resulting from a false statement, misrepresentation, or failure to report a material fact by the claimant, and interest thereon, if:
(a) The benefit payments were made solely as a result of department error or inadvertence and made to a claimant who could not reasonably have been expected to recognize the error; or

Neither the director nor any of his agents or employees shall be liable for benefits paid to persons not entitled to the same under the provisions of this chapter if it appears that such payments have been made in good faith and that ordinary care and diligence have been used in the determination of the validity of the claim or claims under which such benefits have been paid.

The director may, in his sole discretion, compromise any or all of an overpayment, civil penalty in excess of the amount required to be paid into the employment security fund pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of this section, interest or fifty-two (52) week disqualification assessed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and section 72-1366(12), Idaho Code, when the director finds it is in the best interest of the department.

(b) Such payments were made solely as a result of an employer misreporting wages earned in a claimant’s base period and made to a claimant who could not reasonably have been expected to recognize an error in the wages reported.

§ 72-1370. Distribution of benefit payments upon death.

Whenever a benefit claimant dies, having completed a compensable period prior to his death, benefits due the deceased claimant at the time of death shall be payable, without administration, to the surviving spouse, if any, or, if there be no surviving spouse, to the dependent child or children.

§ 72-1371. Misrepresentation to obtain benefits or to prevent payments or to evade contribution liability — Criminal penalty.

The making of a false statement when the maker knows the statement to be false, or the wilful [willful] failure to disclose a material fact in order to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this chapter or under an unemployment insurance law of any state or of the federal government, either for the benefit of the maker or for any other person, is hereby declared to be a felony.

The making by an employer or any officer or agent of an employer or any other person of a false statement or representation when the maker knows the statement or representation to be false, or the willful failure to disclose a material fact to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to any individual entitled thereto or to avoid becoming or remaining a covered employer or to avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment required from a covered employer under this chapter or under any unemployment insurance law of any state or of the federal government, or the willful failure or refusal to make such contributions or other payment or to furnish any such reports required under this chapter is hereby declared to be a misdemeanor.